Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0780.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. As used in this act: (a) "Immigration enforcement agreement" means an agreement between a law enforcement agency and the Department of Homeland Security under section 287(g) of the immigration and nationality act, 8 USC 1357. (b) "Law enforcement agency" means the department of state police, or a police agency of a city, village, township, or county. Sec. 3. Beginning on the effective date of this act, a law enforcement agency shall not enter into, modify, or renew an immigration enforcement agreement.